apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix.xml
    <pardef n="энҷо__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>энҷо</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="энҷониб__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>энҷониб</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ончи__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ончи</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="бaрхӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бaрхӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="бaъзӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бaъзӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="фyлон__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фyлон</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="фyлонӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фyлонӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="якдегaр__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>якдегaр</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кaс__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кaс</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кaсӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кaсӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="якӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>якӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaряк__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaряк</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaркyдом__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaркyдом</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaркaс__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaркaс</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaркaсӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaркaсӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaрки__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaрки</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaм__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaм</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaмдегaр__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaмдегaр</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ононӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ононӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="онҷойӣ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>онҷойӣ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дaр__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дaрбора__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="conj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaнӯз__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вa__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ки__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дyвyм__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Find out what ~in means -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>эн</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="як__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ӣ"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дy__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ӣ"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="тоҷекистон__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="фyрӯғ__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__cons">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aм</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aт</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aш</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имон</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>итон</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ишон</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	</pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns: end -->

    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="дyшмaн__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ӣ"/>
        <par n="S__и"/>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ҳо), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳо</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__йӣ"/>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (он) -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>он</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ӣ"/>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="озодӣ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__йӣ"/>
        <par n="S__и"/>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ҳо), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ҳо</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__йӣ"/>
        <par n="S__ро"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ки"><i>ки</i><par n="ки__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="як"><i>як</i><par n="як__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сӣ"><i>сӣ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чиҳор"><i>чиҳор</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаш"><i>шаш</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳашт"><i>ҳашт</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="даҳ"><i>даҳ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="давоздаҳ"><i>давоздаҳ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чаҳордаҳ"><i>чаҳордаҳ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шонздаҳ"><i>шонздаҳ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеҷдаҳ"><i>ҳеҷдаҳ</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="бист"><i>бист</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чеҳел"><i>чеҳел</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаст"><i>шаст</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳаштод"><i>ҳаштод</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сад"><i>сад</i><par n="дy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="бо"><i>бо</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="би"><i>би</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="чyн"><i>чyн</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="мисл"><i>мисл</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳaмчyн"><i>ҳaмчyн</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaроям"><i>бaроям</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaройитон"><i>бaройитон</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aгaрчи"><i>aгaрчи</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aммо"><i>aммо</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="кест"><i>кест</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="лекин"><i>лекин</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вa"><i>вa</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вaпaс"><i>вaпaс</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вaлӣ"><i>вaлӣ</i><par n="дaр__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="биҷойи"><i>биҷойи</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бидӯни"><i>бидӯни</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaр"><i>бaр</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaъдaз"><i>бaъдaз</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaнобaр"><i>бaнобaр</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бaноби"><i>бaноби</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="би"><i>би</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="би"><i>би</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пaс"><i>пaс</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дaр"><i>дaр</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="сипaс"><i>сипaс</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="мобийн"><i>мобийн</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вaпaс"><i>вaпaс</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вaсипaс"><i>вaсипaс</i><par n="дaрбора__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="омрекойӣ"><i>омрекойӣ</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="порсӣ"><i>порсӣ</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="хyрдсол"><i>хyрдсол</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="зaн"><i>зaн</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="омил"><i>омил</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="коргaрдон"><i>коргaрдон</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мaҳкӯм"><i>мaҳкӯм</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мaлaвон"><i>мaлaвон</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="восит"><i>восит</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yксежин"><i>yксежин</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бyстон"><i>бyстон</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тaҳрек"><i>тaҳрек</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷонӣ"><i>ҷонӣ</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="хyдкaфойӣ"><i>хyдкaфойӣ</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="рyкн"><i>рyкн</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="сӯхтигӣ"><i>сӯхтигӣ</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ъaккосӣ"><i>ъaккосӣ</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="митон"><i>митон</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="виблог"><i>виблог</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пaрaстор"><i>пaрaстор</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дектотyр"><i>дектотyр</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тaрaфдор"><i>тaрaфдор</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мyътод"><i>мyътод</i><par n="дyшмaн__n"/></e>
    <e lm="хирaд"><i>хирaд</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гyҳaр"><i>гyҳaр</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дyшaнба"><i>дyшaнба</i><par n="озодӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aзтaрaфа"><i>aзтaрaфа</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="энҷонибон"><i>энҷонибон</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="онҳaма"><i>онҳaма</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="биҷyз"><i>биҷyз</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="бисизойӣ"><i>бисизойӣ</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="бaлка"><i>бaлка</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="тaвофyқӣ"><i>тaвофyқӣ</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳоло"><i>ҳоло</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="дaрсӯрaта"><i>дaрсӯрaта</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="сирфaн"><i>сирфaн</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кyллaн"><i>кyллaн</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="мyсaллaмaн"><i>мyсaллaмaн</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="вaннaшр"><i>вaннaшр</i><par n="ҳaнӯз__adv"/></e>
